Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-415
Raffle, defined.

(1) Raffle shall mean a gambling scheme in which (a) participants pay or agree to pay something of value for an opportunity to win, (b) winning opportunities are represented by tickets differentiated by sequential enumeration, (c) winners are determined by a random drawing of the tickets or by the method set forth in section 9-426.01 or 9-426.02, and (d) at least eighty percent of all of the prizes to be awarded are merchandise prizes which are not directly or indirectly redeemable for cash by the licensed organization conducting the raffle or any agent of the organization.

(2) Except as provided in section 9-426.02, raffle shall not include (a) any gambling scheme which uses any mechanical, computer, electronic, or video gaming device which has the capability of awarding something of value, free games redeemable for something of value, or tickets or stubs redeemable for something of value, (b) any activity which is authorized or regulated under the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, the State Lottery Act, section 9-701, or Chapter 2, article 12, or (c) activity which is prohibited under Chapter 28, article 11.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 136;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 51;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 9;

Laws 1997, LB 248, § 23;

Laws 2026, LB1001, § 22.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.